District of Columbia statutes.
42-3218

Fraudulent removal, conveyance, or concealment of property to defeat lien subjects guilty party to forfeiture of double value of such property.

If any tenant or lessee shall fraudulently remove and convey away his or her goods or chattels, or if any person or persons shall wilfully and knowingly aid or assist any such tenant or lessee in such fraudulent conveying away or carrying off of any part of his or her goods or chattels, or in concealing the same; all and every person or persons so offending shall forfeit and pay to the landlord or landlords, lessor or lessors, from whose estate such goods and chattels were fraudulently carried off as aforesaid, double the value of the goods by him, her or them respectively carried off or concealed as aforesaid; to be recovered by action of debt in any court of record.

History

11 Geo. 2, ch. 19, § 3, 1738
Kilty’s Rep. 251
Alex. Br. Stat. 732
Comp. Stat. D.C., 329, § 53

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1418.
1973 Ed., § 45-920.